nb: Materiale i glidenøkkelen: Metall; Plast; Annet
es: Material del deslizador de la cremallera: Metal; Plástico; Otro
ru: Материал бегунка молнии: Металл; Пластик; Другой
pl: Materiał mechanizmu suwaka zamka: Metal; Plastik; Inne
nl: Materiaal van de ritssluiting: Metaal; Plastic; Overig
cs: Materiál jezdce zipu: Kov; Plast; Jiné
lt-LT: Užtrauktuko slankiklio medžiaga: Metalas; Plastikas; Kita
sl-SI: Konfiguracija drsnika/poteznega dela zadrge: Kovina; Plastika; Drugo
ko: 지퍼 슬라이더 소재: 금속; 플라스틱; 기타
sk-SK: Materiál zipsového jazdca: Kov; Plast; Iné
hu: Cipzárkocsi anyaga: Fém; Műanyag; Egyéb
zh-TW: 拉鍊頭材質: 金屬; 塑膠; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на плъзгача на ципа: Метал; Пластмаса; Други
pt-BR: Zíper material do cursor: Metal; Plástico; Outros
sv: Material i dragkedjans skjutreglage: Metall; Plast; Övrigt
vi: Chất liệu khóa kéo: Kim loại; Nhựa; Khác
fi: Vetoketjun vetimen materiaali: Metalli; Muovi; Muu
en: Zipper slider material: Metal; Plastic; Other
ro-RO: Materialul cursorului fermoarului: Metal; Plastic; Altele
da: Materiale i lynlåsskyder: Metal; Plast; Andet
it: Materiale del cursore della cerniera: Metallo; Plastica; Altro
ja: ファスナーのスライダー素材: メタル; プラスチック; その他
tr: Fermuar sürgüsü malzemesi: Metal; Plastik; Diğer
el: Υλικό οδηγού φερμουάρ: Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Άλλο
de: Material des Reißverschlussschiebers: Metall; Kunststoff; Sonstige
fr: Matériau du curseur de la fermeture éclair: Métal; Plastique; Autre
th: วัสดุสำหรับตัวเลื่อนซิป: โลหะ; พลาสติก; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal za klizače patentnih zatvarača: Metal; Plastika; Ostalo
pt-PT: Material do cursor do fecho: Metal; Plástico; Outro
zh-CN: 拉链滑块材料: 金属; 塑料; 其他